Washington statutes.
RCW 43.320.050

Assistant directors—Divisions—"FDIC" defined.

The director of financial institutions may appoint assistant directors for each of the divisions of the department and delegate to them the power to perform any act or duty conferred upon the director. The director is responsible for the official acts of these assistant directors.

The department of financial institutions shall consist of at least the following four divisions: The division of FDIC insured institutions, with regulatory authority over all state-chartered FDIC insured institutions; the division of credit unions, with regulatory authority over all state-chartered credit unions; the division of consumer affairs, with regulatory authority over state-licensed nondepository lending institutions and other regulated entities; and the division of securities, with regulatory authority over securities, franchises, business opportunities, and commodities. The director of financial institutions is granted broad administrative authority to add additional responsibilities to these divisions as necessary and consistent with applicable law.

For purposes of this section, "FDIC" means the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

[ 1993 c 472 s 8.]